Washington statutes.
RCW 17.24.161

Funds for technical and scientific services.

The director may, at the director's discretion, provide funds for technical or scientific services, labor, materials and supplies, and biological control agents for the control of plant pests, bee pests, and noxious weeds.

[ 1991 c 257 s 20.]